Arkansas, session 2025, HB1304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 4, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-4-112. Contact information — Lost payees.
(a)(1) A member, retiree, or the designated beneficiary of a deceased
member or retiree shall:
(A) File his or her contact information in writing with
the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System; and
(B) Update any change of contact information on the forms
and in the manner requested by the system.
(2) As used in this section, "contact information" includes
without limitation:
*LJH043*
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
(A) The physical or post office address, telephone number,
and an email address for the member, retiree, or the designated beneficiary
of the deceased member or retiree; and
(B) The bank information of a member, retiree, or the
designated beneficiary of the deceased member or retiree.
(3) The member, retiree, or designated beneficiary of the
deceased member or retiree shall be responsible for ensuring the accuracy of
his or her contact information for all purposes of the system.
(b) The system shall address correspondence to the member, retiree, or
designated beneficiary at the last address provided in the contact
information filed with the system or, if no contact information has been
filed with the system, to an address provided by the covered employer.
(c)(1) If the system is unable to make a payment to a member, retiree,
or designated beneficiary within five (5) years after payment of a benefit is
due to the member, retiree, or designated beneficiary because the system does
not receive a response after notifying the member, retiree, or designated
beneficiary using the contact information provided to the system, then upon
the expiration of the five (5) years, the system may direct that:
(A) Any amount due to the member, retiree, or designated
beneficiary shall be transferred to the general trust assets of the system;
and
(B) Any liabilities to the member, retiree, or designated
beneficiary be removed from the system's records of liabilities and
subsequent actuarial valuations.
(2)(A) If the member, retiree, or designated beneficiary later
submits all documentation required by the system and demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the system his or her entitlement to the payment of any
amounts transferred to the general trust assets of the system, the system may
direct payment to the member, retiree, or designated beneficiary from the
general trust assets of the system.
(B) No interest shall be paid on any amount directed to be
paid to a member, retiree, or designated beneficiary under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section.
(d) If a provision of this section conflicts with a provision of the
Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et seq., the provision of this section
supersedes the conflicting provision of the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
201 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-207 is amended to read as follows:
24-4-207. Bonds — Payments on vouchers and warrants — Adjustment of
erroneous payments Correction of errors — Statute of limitations.
(a)(1) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees'
Retirement System and other designated employees shall make bonds to cover
their liability for the faithful performance of their duties, from time to
time as provided for by law.
(2) The cost of the bonds shall be paid from moneys provided for
the administrative expenses of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System.
(3) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration is authorized and directed to designate such additional
personnel within his or her office and to provide for such services as are
necessary for the proper operation of the system.
(b)(1) The Treasurer of State shall pay annuities and make other
disbursements authorized by this act only on vouchers signed by the Executive
Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and on warrants
issued thereon by the Auditor of State.
(2) No voucher or warrant shall be drawn on funds of the system
unless it has been previously authorized by a specific or general resolution
adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System.
(c)(1)(A) Should any a change or error in the records of the system or
any an audit of a member's annuity calculations result in any person's
receiving more or less than the person would have been entitled to receive
had the records or the calculations been correct an incorrect calculation,
the board shall correct the error and, as far as is equitable and
practicable, shall adjust the payment in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection and in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit to which the person was correctly entitled shall be paid.
(B) However, no monthly adjustment of less than one dollar
($1.00) shall be made.
(2)(A) The board shall have the right to recover any overpayment
that any person may have received from funds of the system, provided if the
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
overpayment is determined and the person is so notified of the error within
one (1) year of the date of the last overpayment the limitation period set
forth in subdivision (c)(7) of this section.
(B) If the An overpayment is determined at a date later
than one (1) year after the date of the last overpayment beyond the
limitation period, the overpayment shall not be recouped by the board unless
the overpayment is a result of an error on the part of a member, retirant, or
beneficiary caused or created through intentional nondisclosure, fraud,
misrepresentation, or gross negligence by the person receiving the
overpayment.
(C) In all instances where an overpayment is determined,
any From the date of correction of the error, subsequent payments shall be
adjusted to the correct amount.
(3) If it is determined that any person has received an
underpayment from the funds of the system, regardless of the date of the
determination, the system shall pay in a lump sum to the person the total of
any underpayments made prior to the date of determination, and any subsequent
payments annuity amount shall be adjusted to the correct amount.
(4)(A) If the annuity amount is decreased upon the
reconsideration correction of the error, the matters involved in the decrease
shall be system shall set forth in writing the reason for the adjustment and
shall be subject to review upon the filing of an appeal thereof by promptly
notify the member or annuity recipient.
(B) The redetermination adjustment of the annuity amount
shall be deemed to be final and binding on all parties unless, within twenty
(20) thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice of the redetermination to
the member's last known address written notification using the contact
information filed with the system, or twenty (20) thirty (30) days after
personal delivery of the notice to the member person, an appeal thereof is
filed the person files a request with the Executive Director of the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System with the executive director for the
executive director's determination of the adjustment.
(C) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall promptly hear all appeals An appeal of annuity
determinations or redeterminations and the executive director's determination
shall conduct such hearings be heard at an administrative hearing in
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
accordance with procedures set forth by the board and the Arkansas
Administrative Procedures Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(5) An action or request to change a record of the system, including without
limitation an attempt to establish service with the system or add service to
a member's record, shall be commenced within the limitation period unless the
system determines:
(A) There is an error within the system's records;
(B) The error was a result of an obvious or documented
error by an employer or the system; and
(C) The member could not have discovered the error with
reasonable due diligence at the time the error occurred.
(6)(A) When the system determines that there is an error in the
records, the director shall have the discretion to resolve the matter in a
fair manner to all parties affected by the error and may waive or modify the
impact of a rule, provision, or law, including without limitation interest
and penalties, if a determination provides clear and convincing evidence that
the error:
(i) Creates an undue hardship to the system, member,
person, or employer that is direct and observable; and
(ii) Was not a result of intentional nondisclosure,
fraud, misrepresentation, or gross negligence.
(B) The executive director’s determination may consider:
(i) The degree of fault of the system, member,
retiree, designated beneficiary, person, or employer;
(ii) Any ambiguity in the interpretation of the
circumstances, rule, or law;
(iii) Whether the cost to the system of correcting
the error is outweighed by the benefit afforded to the system, member,
retiree, designated beneficiary, person, or employer;
(iv) Whether or not an expedited decision serves
public interest; and
(v) The fundamental fairness of a remedy in a
particular situation.
(C) The executive director’s determination shall not:
(i) Substantially impact the actuarial soundness of
the system; or
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
(ii) Conflict with federal law concerning the tax-
qualified status of the system.
(7) As used in subsection (c) of this section, "limitation
period" means a period of time beginning the fiscal year an error occurred or
is alleged to have occurred and the four (4) immediately following fiscal
years.
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-6-205 is amended to read as follows:
24-6-205. Correction of errors.
(a) Should any change or error in the records of the State Police
Retirement System or the Division of Arkansas State Police result in any
person's receiving from the system more or less than he or she would have
been entitled to receive had the records been correct an incorrect
calculation, the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System
shall correct the error and, as far as is equitable and practicable, shall
adjust the payment in accordance with the provisions of this section and in
such manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which the person
was correctly entitled shall be paid.
(b)(1) The board shall have the right to recover any overpayment any
person may have received from funds of the system if an overpayment is
determined and the recipient is notified of the error within the limitation
period set out in subsection (g) of this section.
(2) An overpayment determined beyond the limitation period shall
not be recouped by the board unless the overpayment is a result of an error
caused or created through intentional nondisclosure, fraud,
misrepresentation, or gross negligence by the person receiving the
overpayment.
(3) Subsequent payments shall be adjusted to the correct amount
from the date of correction of the error.
(c) If it is determined that any person has received an underpayment
from the funds of the system:
(1) The system shall pay in a lump sum to the person the total
of the corrected amount; and
(2) Any subsequent annuity amount shall be adjusted to the
correct amount.
(d)(1) If the annuity amount is decreased upon correction of the
error, the system shall:
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
(A) Set forth in writing the reason for the adjustment;
and
(B) Promptly notify the member or annuity recipient.
(2) The adjustment of the annuity amount shall be deemed to be
final and binding on all parties unless, within thirty (30) days after the
mailing of notification to the person’s last address on file with the system,
or thirty (30) days after personal delivery of the notice to the person, the
person files a request with the Executive Secretary of the State Police
Retirement System for the executive secretary’s determination.
(3) An appeal of the executive secretary’s determination shall
be heard at an administrative hearing in accordance with procedures set forth
by the board and the Arkansas Administrative Procedures Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq.
(e) An action or request to change a record of the system, including
without limitation an attempt to establish service with the system or add
service to a member's record, shall be commenced within the limitation period
unless the system determines:
(1) There is an error within the system's records;
(2) The error was a result of an obvious or documented error by
the Division of Arkansas State Police or the system; and
(3) The member could not have discovered the error with
reasonable due diligence at the time the error occurred.
(f)(1) When the system determines that an error exists in the records,
the executive secretary shall have the discretion to resolve the matter in a
fair manner to all parties affected by the error and may waive or modify the
impact of a rule, provision, or law, including interest and penalties, if a
determination provides clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) The error creates an undue hardship to the system,
member, retiree, designated beneficiary, person, or the Division of Arkansas
State Police that is direct and observable; and
(B) The error was not a result of intentional
nondisclosure, fraud, misrepresentation, or gross negligence.
(2) The executive secretary’s determination may consider:
(A) The degree of fault of the system, member, retiree,
designated beneficiary, person, or the Division of the Arkansas State Police;
(B) An ambiguity in the interpretation of the
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
circumstances, rule, or law;
(C) Whether the cost to the system of correcting the error
is outweighed by the benefit afforded to the system, member, retiree,
designated beneficiary, person, or the Division of the Arkansas State Police;
(D) Whether or not an expedited decision serves the public
interest; and
(E) The fundamental fairness of a remedy in a particular
situation.
(3) The executive secretary’s determination shall not:
(A) Substantially impact the actuarial soundness of the
system; or
(B) Conflict with federal law concerning the tax-qualified
status of the system.
(g) As used in this section, "limitation period" means a period of
time beginning the fiscal year an error occurred or is alleged to have
occurred and the four (4) immediately following fiscal years.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of the Arkansas
Code related to member, retiree, and designated beneficiary contact
information under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System are in
need of revision in order to provide clarity and increase efficiency of the
system; that a limitation period is needed for the correction of errors of
records of members, retirees, and designated beneficiaries under the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System and the State Police Retirement System in
order to provide clarity and increase efficiency of the systems; and that
this act is immediately necessary to achieve the goals of the respective
systems to safeguard and maintain an orderly system of benefits. Therefore,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1304
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Warren

































03-05-2025 10:17:15 LJH043